Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.285

Articles of incorporation.

A copy of the articles of incorporation of any agency or amendments to the articles of existing corporation agencies shall be sent by the secretary of state to the department at the time such articles or amendments are filed.

[ 2006 c 265 s 304. Formerly RCW 43.215.230.]